Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-635
Birth or death certificate; amendments; application; by whom made.

(1) To amend a birth certificate, application may be made by one of the parents, the guardian, the registrant if of legal age, or the individual responsible for filing the certificate.

(2) To amend a death or fetal death certificate, except the medical certification, application may be made by the next of kin or the funeral director and embalmer or person acting as such. Amendments to the medical certification of cause of death section of the certificate shall be requested by the attending physician or person certifying such section.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 12.